Massachusetts, session 194th, H1670.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 30 of Chapter 71 of the General Laws is hereby repealed.
SECTION 2. Section 31 of Chapter 71 of the General Laws is hereby amended by
striking the first sentence.
SECTION 3. Section 15 of Chapter 233 is hereby amended by striking the wording in its
entirety and inserting in place thereof the following:- In all cases in which an oath or affirmation
of truthfulness is required by law, the oath or affirmation shall make no religious reference and
the person administrating the oath or affirmation shall require only that the person taking the
oath or affirmation hold up his or her hand and affirm that the testimony or declaration is truthful
and, when appropriate, made under the penalties of perjury.
of 2

SECTION 4. Sections 16 through 19 of Chapter 233 of the General Laws are hereby
repealed.
SECTION 5. Section 26 of Chapter 272 of the General Laws is hereby repealed.
SECTION 6. Section 29 of Chapter 272 of the General Laws is hereby repealed.
SECTION 7. Section 34 of Chapter 272 of the General Laws is hereby repealed.
SECTION 8. Section 35 of Chapter 272 of the General Laws is hereby repealed.
SECTION 9. Section 36 of Chapter 272 of the General Laws is hereby repealed.
of 2